Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-242
Authority; agricultural projects; duties.

Prior to exercising any of the powers authorized by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act regarding agricultural projects as defined in subdivision (2) of section 58-219, the authority shall require:

(1) That no loan will be made to any person with a net worth of more than one million dollars;

(2) That the lender certify and agree that it will use the proceeds of such loan, investment, sale, or assignment within a reasonable period of time to make loans or purchase loans to provide agricultural enterprises or, if such lender has made a commitment to make loans to provide agricultural enterprises on the basis of a commitment from the authority to purchase such loans, such lender will make such loans and sell the same to the authority within a reasonable period of time;

(3) That the lender certify that the borrower is an individual who is actively engaged in or who will become actively engaged in an agricultural enterprise after he or she receives the loan or that the borrower is a firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity with all owners, partners, members, or stockholders thereof being natural persons who are actively engaged in or who will be actively engaged in an agricultural enterprise after the loan is received;

(4) That the aggregate amount of the loan received by a borrower shall not exceed five hundred seventeen thousand seven hundred dollars, as such amount shall be adjusted for inflation in accordance with section 147(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. In computing such amount a loan received by an individual shall be aggregated with those loans received by his or her spouse and minor children and a loan received by a firm, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation shall be aggregated with those loans received by each owner, partner, member, or stockholder thereof; and

(5) That the recipient of the loan be identified in the minutes of the authority prior to or at the time of adoption by the authority of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds which will provide for financing of the loan.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 42;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 43;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 356;

Laws 2005, LB 90, § 17;

Laws 2015, LB515, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB562, § 12.